Hawaii statutes.
[§481E-4] Registration as athlete agent;
form; requirements. (a) An applicant for registration shall submit
an application for registration to the director in a form prescribed by the
director. An application filed under this section is a government record. The
application shall be in the name of an individual and, except as otherwise
provided in subsection (b), signed or otherwise authenticated by the applicant
under penalty of perjury or of unsworn falsification to authorities, as
applicable, and shall state or contain:

(1) The name of the applicant and the address of the
applicant's principal place of business;

(2) The name of the applicant's business or employer,
if applicable;

(3) Any business or occupation engaged in by the
applicant for the five years next preceding the date of submission of the
application;

(4) A description of the applicant's:

(A) Formal training as an athlete agent;

(B) Practical experience as an athlete agent;
and

(C) Educational background relating to the
applicant's activities as an athlete agent;

(5) The names and addresses of three individuals not
related to the applicant who are willing to serve as references;

(6) The name, sport, and last known team for each
individual for whom the applicant acted as an athlete agent during the five
years next preceding the date of submission of the application;

(7) The names and addresses of all persons who are:

(A) With respect to the athlete agent's
business if it is not a corporation, the partners, members, officers, managers,
associates, or profit-sharers of the business; and

(B) With respect to a corporation employing
the athlete agent, the officers, directors, and any shareholder of the
corporation having an interest of five per cent or greater;

(8) Whether the applicant or any person named
pursuant to paragraph (7) has been convicted of a crime that, if committed in
this State, would be a crime involving moral turpitude or a felony, and
identify the crime;

(9) Whether there has been any administrative or
judicial determination that the applicant or any person named pursuant to
paragraph (7) has made a false, misleading, deceptive, or fraudulent
representation;

(10) Any instance in which the conduct of the
applicant or any person named pursuant to paragraph (7) resulted in the
imposition on a student-athlete or educational institution of a sanction,
suspension, or declaration of ineligibility to participate in an
interscholastic or intercollegiate athletic event;

(11) Any sanction, suspension, or disciplinary action
taken against the applicant or any person named pursuant to paragraph (7)
arising out of occupational or professional conduct; and

(12) Whether there has been any denial of an
application for, suspension or revocation of, or refusal to renew, the registration
or licensure of the applicant or any person named pursuant to paragraph (7) as
an athlete agent in any state.

(b) An individual who has submitted an
application for, and holds a certificate of, registration or licensure as an
athlete agent in another state, may submit a copy of the application and
certificate in lieu of submitting an application in the form prescribed
pursuant to subsection (a). The director shall accept the application and the
certificate from the other state as an application for registration in this
State if the application to the other state:

(1) Was submitted in the other state within the six
months next preceding the submission of the application in this State and the
applicant certifies that the information contained in the application is
current;

(2) Contains information substantially similar to or
more comprehensive than that required in an application submitted in this
State; and

(3) Was signed by the applicant under penalty of
perjury or of a related offense in the other state. [L 2007, c 248, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next